Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5669.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 Sec. 1301. As used in this part: (a) "Application period" means the period beginning when an application for a permit is received by the state and ending when the application is considered to be administratively complete under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 section 1305 and any applicable fee has been paid. (b) "Department" means the department, agency, or officer authorized by this act to approve or deny an application for a particular permit. As used in sections 1315 to 1317, "department" means the department of environmental quality. (c) "Director" means the director of the state department authorized under this act to approve or deny an application for a particular permit or the director's designee. As used in sections 1313 to 1317, "director" means the director of the department of environmental quality. (d) "Environmental permit review commission" or "commission" means the environmental permit review commission established under section 1313(1)."Environmental permit panel" or "panel" means a panel of the environmental permit review commission, appointed under section 1315(2). (e) "Environmental permit panel" or "panel" means a panel of the environmental permit review commission, appointed under section 1315(2)."Environmental permit review commission" or "commission" means the environmental permit review commission established under section 1313(1). (f) "Permit", except as provided in subdivision (g), means a permit, operating license, or registration required by any of the following sections or by rules promulgated thereunder, or, in the case of section 9112, by an ordinance referred to in that section: (i) Section 3104, floodplain alteration permit. (ii) Section 3503, permit for use of water in mining iron ore. (iii) Section 4105, sewerage system construction permit. (iv) Section 6516, vehicle testing license. (v) Section 6521, motor vehicle fleet testing permit. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (vi) Section 8310, restricted use pesticide dealer license. (vii) Section 8310a, agricultural pesticide dealer license. (viii) Section 8504, license to manufacture or distribute fertilizer. (ix) Section 9112, local soil erosion and sedimentation control permit. (x) Section 11509, solid waste disposal area construction permit. (xi) Section 11512, solid waste disposal area operating license. (xii) Section 11542, municipal solid waste incinerator ash landfill operating license amendment. (xiii) Section 11702, septage waste servicing license or septage waste vehicle license. (xiv) Section 11709, septage waste site permit. (xv) Section 30104, inland lakes and streams project permit. (xvi) Section 30304, state permit for dredging, filling, or other activity in wetland. Permit includes an authorization for a specific project to proceed under a general permit issued under section 30312. (xvii) Section 31509, dam construction, repair, or removal permit. (xviii) Section 32312, flood risk, high risk, or environmental area permit. (xix) Section 32512, permit for dredging and filling bottomland. (xx) Section 32603, permit for submerged log removal from Great Lakes bottomlands. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (xxi) Section 35304, department permit for critical dune area use. (xxii) Section 36505, endangered species permit. (xxiii) Section 41329, nonnative aquatic species sales registration. (xxiv) Section 41702, game bird hunting preserve license. (xxv) Section 42101, dog training area permit. (xxvi) Section 42501, fur dealer's license. (xxvii) Section 42702, game dealer's license. (xxviii) Section 44513, charter boat operating permit under reciprocal agreement. (xxix) Section 44516, boat livery operating permit. (xxx) Section 45902, game fish propagation license. (xxxi) Section 45906, game fish import license. (xxxii) Section 48705, permit to take amphibians and reptiles for scientific or educational use. (xxxiii) Section 61525, oil or gas well drilling permit. (xxxiv) Section 62509, brine, storage, or waste disposal well drilling or conversion permit or test well drilling permit. (xxxv) Section 63103a, ferrous mineral mining permit. (xxxvi) Section 63514 or 63525, surface coal mining and reclamation permit or revision of the permit, respectively. (xxxvii) Section 63704, sand dune mining permit. (xxxviii) Section 65102, carbon dioxide sequestration project operating permit. (xxxix) (xxxviii) Section 72108, use permits for a Pure Michigan Trail. (xl) (xxxix) Section 76109, sunken aircraft or watercraft 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 abandoned property recovery permit. (xli) (xxxx) Section 76504, Mackinac Island motor vehicle and land use permits. (xlii) (xxxxi) Section 80159, buoy or beacon permit. (g) "Permit", as used in sections 1313 to 1317, means any permit or operating license that meets both of the following conditions: (i) The applicant for the permit or operating license is not this state or a political subdivision of this state. (ii) The permit or operating license is issued by the department of environmental quality under this act or the rules promulgated under this act. (h) "Processing deadline" means the last day of the processing period. (i) "Processing period", subject to section 1307(2) and (3), means the following time period after the close of the application period, for the following permit, as applicable: (i) Twenty days for a permit under section 61525 or 62509. (ii) Thirty days for a permit under section 9112 or 44516. (iii) Thirty days after the department consults with the underwater salvage and preserve committee created under section 76103, for a permit under section 76109. (iv) Sixty days, for a permit under section 30104 or 32512 for a project in a minor project category established under section 30105(7) or 32512a(1), or respectively, for an authorization for a specific project to proceed under a general permit issued under section 30105(8) or 32512a(2), or for a permit under section 32312 or 41329. (v) Sixty days or, if a hearing is held, 90 days for a permit 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 under section 35304. (vi) Sixty days or, if a hearing is held, 120 days for a permit under section 30104, other than a permit or authorization described in subparagraph (ii) or (iv), or for a permit under section 31509. (vii) Ninety days for a permit under section 11512, a revision of a surface coal mining and reclamation permit under section 63525, or a permit under section 72108. (viii) Ninety days or, if a hearing is held, 150 days for a permit under section 3104 or 30304, or a permit under section 32512 other than a permit described in subparagraph (iv). (ix) Ninety days after the close of the review or comment period under section 32604, 32605, or if a public hearing is held, 90 days after the date of the public hearing for a permit under section 32603. (x) One hundred twenty days for a permit under section 11509, 11542, 63103a, 63514, or 63704. (xi) One hundred fifty days for a permit under section 36505. However, if a site inspection or federal approval is required, the 150-day period is tolled pending completion of the inspection or receipt of the federal approval. (xii) Two hundred days for a permit under section 65102. (xiii) For any other permit, 150 days or, if a hearing is held, 90 days after the hearing, whichever is later. ARTICLE III NATURAL RESOURCES MANAGEMENT CHAPTER 3 MANAGEMENT OF NONRENEWABLE RESOURCES Subchapter 6 CARBON SEQUESTRATION 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Part 651 CARBON SEQUESTRATION REGULATION Sec. 65101. As used in this part: (a) "Carbon dioxide" means carbon dioxide that is produced by anthropogenic sources and is of such purity and quality that it will not compromise the safety of geologic storage and will not compromise those properties of a storage reservoir that allow the reservoir to effectively enclose and contain a stored gas. (b) "Carbon dioxide capture project" means that term as defined in section 5501. (c) "Carbon dioxide sequestration activity" or "sequestration activity" means the injection of 1 or more carbon dioxide streams into underground geologic formations for geologic storage. Carbon sequestration activity does not include an enhanced oil recovery activity or the transport by pipeline of carbon dioxide to a carbon dioxide sequestration project. (d) "Carbon dioxide sequestration project" or "sequestration project" means 1 or more nonexperimental injection wells that connect a surface facility and equipment to a storage reservoir, the storage reservoir, and underground and surface facilities and equipment used or proposed to be used for sequestration activity. Carbon dioxide sequestration project does not include an enhanced oil recovery well or pipelines used to transport carbon dioxide to a carbon dioxide sequestration project. (e) "Carbon dioxide sequestration project operator" or "operator" means a person that holds or is an applicant for a permit under this part. (f) "Carbon dioxide storage reservoir" or "storage reservoir" means a subsurface sedimentary stratum or formation containing pore 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 space, including, but not limited to, a depleted reservoir or saline formation, that is suitable for the injection and geologic storage of carbon dioxide. Storage reservoir includes the proposed and actual subsurface 3-dimensional extent of the carbon dioxide plume, associated area of elevated pressure, and displaced fluids. Storage reservoir does not include a class II well that has been converted to a class VI well. (g) "Carbon dioxide stream" means that term as defined in section 5501. (h) "Class II well" means a well described as class II in 40 CFR 144.6. (i) "Class VI well" means a well described as class VI in 40 CFR 144.6. (j) "Department" means the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (k) "Environmental justice community" means a geographic area that the department has identified as a community facing a disproportionate environmental burden, using the department's MiEJScreen and indicators such as sensitive populations, socioeconomic factors, exposures, and environmental effects. (l) "Federal regulations" means any regulatory requirement applicable to a carbon dioxide sequestration well project under the United States Environmental Protection Agency underground injection control program for class VI wells provided for in 40 CFR part 145. (m) "Geologic storage" means the permanent underground storage of carbon dioxide in a storage reservoir. (n) "Nonparticipating surface estate" means real property on which a surface facility or injection well of a carbon dioxide sequestration project is not located. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (o) "Permit", unless the context indicates otherwise, means a permit issued under this part authorizing a person to operate a carbon dioxide sequestration project. Sec. 65102. (1) A person shall not engage in a carbon dioxide sequestration activity or construct or operate a carbon dioxide sequestration project except pursuant to a permit issued by the department pursuant to part 13. This prohibition does not apply to any sequestration project in existence and permitted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section or to any class VI well for which a class VI well permit application was filed with the United States Environmental Protection Agency and a completeness determination was received before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (2) An application to obtain a carbon dioxide sequestration permit under this part shall include, at a minimum, the following: (a) A map and accompanying description that clearly identifies the location of all carbon dioxide sequestration activities for which a permit is sought. (b) A map and accompanying description that clearly identifies the properties and any historic or culturally sensitive areas overlaying the sequestration activity. (c) A description of how the operator will eliminate, minimize, or mitigate impacts on properties and historic or culturally sensitive areas overlaying the sequestration area. (d) Copies of any permit and related application materials submitted to or issued by the United States Environmental Protection Agency in accordance with the federal class VI well program. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) A report describing air, groundwater, and soil gas baseline conditions at the sequestration project and any surrounding surface properties potentially impacted by a release from the sequestration activity. The report shall meet all of the following requirements: (i) Contain sampling data generated within 180 calendar days before the submission of the permit application. (ii) Identify the constituents of concern for which monitoring was conducted and the method for selecting those constituents of concern. (iii) Describe the sampling methodology employed to collect and test air, groundwater, and soil samples in a manner consistent with standards established by a national laboratory accreditation body. (iv) Identify the accredited laboratory used to conduct the testing. (v) Include the sampling results for the identified constituents of concern. (f) An air, groundwater, and soil monitoring plan that complies with rules promulgated under section 65118. (g) Documentation that the applicant has registered a large water withdrawal with the department under the water withdrawal assessment tool provided for in part 327. The permit applicant shall also submit documentation outlining potential impacts on groundwater quantity, such as aquifer drawdown, if modeling shows those impacts will occur. (h) A remedial action plan that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Identifies all necessary remedial actions to address air, groundwater, surface water, and soil impacts from a release from 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the sequestration activity. Impacts from a release of carbon dioxide shall be addressed through either or both of the following: (A) The installation of an appropriate treatment system designed to remove contaminants of concern emplaced by, or the increase in any contaminants of concern that result from, the sequestration activity. (B) The removal of all impacted soil or water and transportation of the soil or water to an appropriately permitted facility for treatment, storage, or disposal. (ii) Includes a demonstration of the performance, reliability, ease of implementation, and potential impacts, including safety, cross-media impacts, and control of exposure of any residual contamination, of the selected corrective actions. (iii) Identifies a reasonable timeline and describe the procedure for implementation and completion of the remedial action plan, following a release attributable to the sequestration activity. (iv) A plan to provide to comply with the requirements of section 65107(4). (v) Other reasonable requirements imposed by the department. (i) A closure plan that addresses the post-injection site care and closure. This requirement may be satisfied by the submission of copies of documents provided to the United States Environmental Protection Agency in accordance with 40 CFR 146.93 if the applicant satisfies the requirements of this section. The closure plan shall include the following: (i) The pressure differential between pre-injection and predicted post-injection pressures at all injection zones. (ii) The predicted position of the carbon dioxide plume and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 associated pressure front at site closure. (iii) The duration of the post-injection site care period that ensures it will not contaminate groundwater, or pose a risk to human health or the environment. The post-injection site care period shall be no less than 30 years from the last date of injection. (j) A written estimate of the cost of all air monitoring, groundwater monitoring, soil gas monitoring, emergency response, remedial action, and closure activities required by this section. The cost estimate shall be calculated in terms of reasonable actual remedial, construction, maintenance, and labor costs that the department would bear if contracting to complete the actions set forth in an air monitoring, soil gas monitoring, emergency response, remedial action, and closure plans set forth in a department-approved permit. The sequestration project operator shall revise the cost estimate whenever there is a change in the air monitoring, soil gas monitoring, emergency response, remedial action, or closure plans that would result in an increase to the cost estimate. The operator shall annually revise the cost estimate to adjust for inflation. Revisions to the cost estimate shall be submitted to the department as a permit modification. (k) Proof that the applicant has financial assurance sufficient to satisfy the requirements set forth in section 65111. (l) Proof of insurance that complies with the requirements set forth in section 65110. (m) An environmental justice analysis that includes, but is not limited to, the following: (i) An assessment of the proposed sequestration project's negative impacts on environmental justice communities and on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 economically disadvantaged rural communities. (ii) Alternatives to mitigate any negative impacts identified under subparagraph (i). (3) If an electric provider or independent power producer submits an application for a permit to the department, the electric provider or independent power producer shall simultaneously submit a copy of the application to the Michigan public service commission for informational purposes. (4) The owner or operator of a sequestration project is exempt from obtaining a permit under part 625, but is not exempt from obtaining any other permit or approval required under state or federal law. The part does not exempt an electric provider or independent power producer to which a permit is issued from obtaining any other permit, a license, or an authorization for the recovery of costs that is required by state or federal law. (5) A permit applicant shall provide the names and addresses of record for all of the following persons that have interests in the storage reservoir proposed for use in the sequestration project or within 1/2 mile of the outermost boundaries of the storage reservoir: (a) Oil, gas, and mineral lessees. (b) Oil, gas, and mineral owners. (c) Holders of permits to drill and operate under part 615 or 625. (d) Pore space owners. (6) The department may enter into cooperative agreements with other governments or government entities to regulate carbon sequestration projects that extend beyond this state's regulatory authority. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 65103. Upon submission of a carbon dioxide sequestration project permit application, and in addition to any other fees required by law, the carbon dioxide sequestration project operator shall remit to the department an initial permit application fee of $60,000.00 per well drilled or planned to be drilled in a single sequestration project. The fee shall be deposited in the carbon dioxide sequestration fund created in section 65116. Sec. 65104. (1) The department shall hold a public hearing on a permit application within 60 days after the application is considered to be administratively complete under section 1305. The department may prepare a draft permit under federal regulations. The public notice shall include a link to a website where copies of the permit application or draft permit, and all included attachments that are not protected under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, are posted. (2) The department shall provide notice of the purpose, time, and location of a public hearing under subsection (1) at least 30 days before the public hearing as follows: (a) By publication in 1 or more newspapers of general circulation in each county in which all or part of the proposed carbon dioxide sequestration project is to be located. (b) By posting the notice on the department's website. (c) By first class mail with proof of delivery to each of the following: (i) All of the following persons that have interests in the storage reservoir proposed for use in the sequestration project or within 1/2 mile of the outermost boundaries of the storage reservoir, using information provided by the applicant under section 65102(5): 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (A) Oil, gas, and mineral lessees. (B) Oil, gas, and mineral owners. (C) Holders of permits to drill and operate under part 615 or 625. (D) Pore space owners. (E) Owners and lessees of subsurface geological formations and cap rock. (ii) Surface owners of land overlying the storage reservoir proposed for use in the carbon sequestration project or within 1/2 mile of the outermost boundaries of the storage reservoir. (3) If substantial compliance with the notice requirements in this section is achieved, inadvertent mistakes in compliance are not a bar to processing the permit. (4) After the public hearing, the department shall provide a 60-day period for public comments on the permit application or draft permit. The department will make copies of all comments received available on its website and consider those comments when rendering its permit decision. (5) The owner of a mineral interest may request a hearing with the department during the permit processing period to present evidence that the mineral interest would be damaged by the project as proposed in the permit application. The department shall do all of the following: (a) Attempt to mediate the dispute. (b) Request modifications to drilling and construction plans as necessary to ensure the mineral interest is not damaged. (c) Consider the evidence presented when making the final permit decision. Sec. 65105. (1) The department may issue a permit if the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department determines all of the following: (a) The carbon dioxide sequestration project operator has complied with this part in relation to the application, subject to section 65104(3). (b) The operator has submitted to the department all information required under federal regulations and required by this part. (c) The sequestration project has obtained all necessary federal and state permits and will comply with federal and state regulations, including, but not limited to, requirements to protect underground sources of drinking water. (d) The sequestration project will not contaminate groundwater or drinking water or pose a risk to human health or the environment. (e) If carbon dioxide leaks from the injection well or compressor, the carbon dioxide will not flow or accumulate in a location where it would endanger public health or safety. (f) The operator has obtained all legal rights or authorizations that are necessary to operate the sequestration project and monitoring activities as required by a permit issued under this part, as demonstrated by documentation of the operator's ownership interests, or written approval of the persons holding legal rights in, the necessary property or by an order for unit operations under part 653. (g) The sequestration project will not use the surface land of or the pore space underlying a state park; local park; state designated wilderness or natural area; or area of state land that is being conserved or managed for biological diversity or to protect ecologically significant features, plants, or wildlife. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (h) The location of each injection well and each compressor in the project meets the following minimum setback requirements, with setback distances measured from the nearest edge of the perimeter fencing of the carbon dioxide sequestration project: Setback Description Setback Distance Occupied community buildings, schools, hospitals, or clinics located on nonparticipating surface estate 2,000 feet from the nearest point on the outer wall Public road right-of-way 50 feet measured from the nearest edge of a public road right-of-way Nonparticipating residential surface estate 2,000 feet measured from the nearest point on the surface estate property line (i) The sequestration project does not generate a maximum sound in excess of 55 average hourly decibels as modeled at the nearest outer wall of the nearest dwelling located on an adjacent nonparticipating surface estate. Decibel modeling shall use the A-weighted scale as designed by the American National Standards Institute. (j) The sequestration project lighting will be dark sky friendly. (2) Before issuing a permit, the department may request amendments or modifications to any of the materials submitted under section 65102 or attach reasonable conditions to the permit the department deems necessary to safeguard groundwater, public health, and the environment. Sec. 65106. If the department issues a permit, it shall also 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 issue a certificate stating that the permit has been issued. The certificate shall describe the area covered and include other information the department considers appropriate. The carbon dioxide sequestration project operator shall file a copy of the certificate with the county register of deeds of each county where the sequestration project is located. Sec. 65107. (1) Unless otherwise expressly provided by contract, bill of sale, deed, mortgage, deed of trust, or other legally binding document or by other applicable law, a carbon dioxide sequestration project operator holds title to or control of the carbon dioxide injected into and stored in a storage reservoir. (2) The owner or operator of a carbon dioxide sequestration project may be liable for damage, including, but not limited to, wrongful death, bodily injury, or tangible property damage, caused by a release attributable to the sequestration activity, including, but not limited to, damage caused by carbon dioxide or other fluids released from the sequestration project, regardless of who holds title to the carbon dioxide, the pore space, or the surface estate. Liability for damage caused by a release attributable to the sequestration activity that is within a sequestration project or otherwise within an operator's control, including carbon dioxide being transferred from a pipeline to the injection well, may be joint and several with a third party adjudicated to have caused or contributed to such damage. A claim of subsurface trespass is not actionable against an operator or an owner of a sequestration project conducting sequestration activity in accordance with a class VI well permit and a permit issued under this part, unless the claimant proves that either of the following applies to injection or migration of carbon dioxide: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) It substantially interferes with the claimant's reasonable use and enjoyment of their real property. (b) It has caused wrongful death or direct physical injury to a person, an animal, or tangible property. (3) The operator or owner of a sequestration project for which a permit is issued under this part is liable for damage that may result from equipment associated with sequestration activity, including, but not limited to, operation of the equipment. Liability for damage resulting from equipment associated with carbon sequestration, including equipment used to transfer carbon dioxide from the pipeline to the injection well, may be joint and several with a third party adjudicated to have caused or contributed to the damage. (4) If groundwater monitoring required by a permit issued or by rules promulgated under this part or required by a class VI well permit issued by the United States Environment Protection Agency indicates that a source of drinking water has been rendered unsafe for drinking by humans or livestock, the carbon dioxide sequestration project operator shall provide an alternate supply of potable drinking water within 24 hours after the monitoring results become available and an alternate supply of water that is safe for other necessary uses within 30 days after the monitoring results become available. The operator shall continue to provide alternate supplies of both potable water and water that is safe for other uses until additional monitoring by the operator shows that the original source of drinking water is safe for drinking and other uses or until a permanent alternate supply of water is identified and provided. (5) If there is a significant leak of carbon dioxide from an 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 injection well, monitoring well, or other point on the surface, that is associated with the carbon sequestration project, all individuals residing within 1 mile of the point of the leak at the time of the leak are entitled to medical monitoring. The monitoring shall be of a scope and duration determined by the department of health and human services and be conducted at the expense of the carbon dioxide sequestration facility operator. (6) This state is not liable for any damage caused by or attributable to the sequestration activity. Sec. 65108. (1) The department shall review a permit issued under this part as required by applicable federal and state regulations. (2) Pursuant to federal and state regulations, a permit may be modified, revoked and reissued, or terminated at the request of the permittee or upon the department's initiative. (3) A permit may be transferred to a new carbon dioxide sequestration project operator only if the department determines the new operator will adhere to the conditions of the permit. Sec. 65109. (1) The owner or operator of a carbon dioxide sequestration project shall monitor the site during the post-injection care period, which shall be no less than 30 years after the last date of injection, as well as following certification of closure by the United States Environmental Protection Agency. The monitoring shall show the position of the carbon dioxide and pressure front to ensure that the sequestration project will not contaminate groundwater or pose a risk to human health or the environment. Monitoring required by a carbon dioxide sequestration activity permit issued by the department shall continue until the department certifies the sequestration project as closed. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) The department shall certify a sequestration project as closed if both of the following apply: (a) A minimum post-injection period of 30 years has passed. (b) The owner or operator demonstrates to the department that no additional monitoring is needed to ensure the sequestration project will not contaminate groundwater or pose a risk to human health or the environment. The demonstration shall include location-specific monitoring data. As the demonstration, the owner or operator may submit to the department a copy of a closure certification issued for the sequestration project in accordance with 40 CFR 146.93 if the certification otherwise meets the requirements of this subsection. (3) The certification of closure does not relieve an operator of any liabilities from the carbon dioxide sequestration activity or sequestration project. Sec. 65110. (1) The operator or the owner of a carbon dioxide sequestration project shall maintain insurance to cover wrongful death, bodily injuries, property damages, and public or private losses related to a release from the sequestration project from an insurer holding at least an A- rating by an AM Best or equivalent credit rating agency. The insurance shall be in an amount of at least $25,000,000.00 per carbon sequestration project. (2) The operator or the owner of a sequestration project shall maintain insurance required under subsection (1) from the commencement of sequestration activity, throughout the post-injection time frame, and until the department certifies that the sequestration project is closed. (3) The insurance policy shall provide that the insurer may not cancel or terminate the policy, except for failure to pay the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 premium. (4) The insurance policy shall allow for assignment to a successor owner or operator. The insurer shall not unreasonably withhold consent to assignment of the insurance policy. Sec. 65111. (1) The operator or the owner of a carbon dioxide sequestration project permitted under this part shall maintain financial assurance in an amount equal to or greater than the cost estimate calculated in accordance with section 65102(2)(i). (2) The operator or the owner of a sequestration project shall use 1 or more of the following mechanisms as financial assurance: (a) A fully funded trust fund. (b) A surety bond guaranteeing payment. (c) A surety bond guaranteeing performance. (3) A financial assurance mechanism shall identify the department as the sole beneficiary. The financial assurance mechanism shall be on forms adopted by the department. The department shall adopt the forms within 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (4) The department shall release a trustee, surety, or other financial institution holding a financial assurance mechanism when either of the following occurs: (a) The operator or the owner of a carbon dioxide sequestration project substitutes alternative financial assurance such that the total financial assurance for the site is equal to or greater than the current cost estimate, without counting the amounts to be released. (b) The department determines that the owner or operator is no longer required to maintain a permit. (5) The department may enter into contracts and agreements 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 that it considers necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. (6) The department may order that an operator or the owner of a carbon sequestration project modify the financial assurance or order that proceeds from financial assurance be applied. The department may pursue legal action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce its rights under financial instruments used to provide the financial assurance required. (7) If a sequestration project has a closure plan approved by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under 40 CFR 146.93, the operator or the owner of the sequestration project may satisfy the financial assurance requirements for any portion of the cost estimates for closure costs required by the department by submitting to the department true copies of the financial assurance mechanism required by 40 CFR 146.85, if the mechanism complies with this section. Sec. 65112. (1) Within 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall submit to the United States Environmental Protection Agency administrator an application to administer a class VI well program. The application shall include a complete program description, a letter from the governor, and a statement from the attorney general, to the United States Environmental Protection Agency administrator under federal regulations. (2) The department may enter into a memorandum of agreement with the regional administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency as permitted by federal regulations. Sec. 65113. Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a person shall not do any of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 following: (a) Install or operate a carbon dioxide sequestration project without a permit issued under this part or a valid class VI well permit. (b) Inject any carbon dioxide stream produced by a carbon dioxide capture project into a class II well or a class VI well converted from a class II well, for purposes of enhanced oil or gas recovery, including, but not limited to, the facilitation of enhanced oil or gas recovery from another well. (c) Sell or transport a concentrated carbon dioxide stream produced by a carbon dioxide capture project for use in enhanced oil or gas recovery. (d) Engage in carbon dioxide sequestration activity in a manner that causes, threatens, or allows the release of carbon dioxide so as to tend to cause water or air pollution in this state. Sec. 65114. (1) The attorney general may commence a civil action for appropriate relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction, for a violation of this part or a provision of a permit or order issued or rule promulgated under this part. An action under this subsection may be brought in the circuit court for the county of Ingham or for the county in which the defendant is located, resides, or is doing business. If requested by the defendant within 21 days after service of process, the court shall grant a change of venue to the circuit court for the county of Ingham or for the county in which the alleged violation occurred, is occurring, or, in the event of a threat of violation, will occur. The court has jurisdiction to restrain the violation and to require compliance. In addition to any other relief granted under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 this subsection, the court, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, shall impose a civil fine of not less than $50,000.00 and the court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party. However, for a failure to timely report a release discharge to the department, the court shall impose a civil fine of not more than $30,000.00. (2) A person who at the time of the violation knew or should have known that the person discharged a substance contrary to this part, or contrary to a permit or order issued or rule promulgated under this part, or who intentionally makes a false statement, representation, or certification in an application for or form pertaining to a permit or in a notice or report required by the terms and conditions of an issued permit, or who intentionally renders inaccurate a monitoring device or record required to be maintained by the department, or who operates a sequestration project without a permit, if required under section 65102(1), is guilty of a felony and shall be fined not less than $50,000.00 or more than $300,000.00 for each violation. The court may impose an additional fine of not more than $25,000.00 per day for each day during which the unlawful discharge occurred. If the conviction is for a violation committed after a first conviction of the person under this subsection, the court shall impose a fine of not less than $25,000.00 per day and not more than $50,000.00 per day of violation. Upon conviction, in addition to a fine, the court in its discretion may sentence the defendant to imprisonment for not more than 2 years or impose probation upon a person for a violation of this part. With the exception of the issuance of criminal complaints, the issuance of warrants, and the holding of an arraignment, the circuit court for the county in which the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 violation occurred has exclusive jurisdiction. However, the person shall not be subject to the penalties of this subsection if the discharge is in conformance with and obedient to a rule, order, or permit of the department. In addition to a fine, the attorney general may file a civil suit in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the full value of the injuries done to the natural resources of this state and the costs of surveillance and enforcement by the state resulting from the violation. (3) Upon a finding by the court that the actions of a civil defendant pose or posed a substantial endangerment to the public health, safety, or welfare, the court shall impose, in addition to the sanctions set forth in subsection (1), a fine of not less than $1,000,000.00 and not more than $10,000,000.00. (4) Upon a finding by the court that the actions of a criminal defendant pose or posed a substantial endangerment to the public health, safety, or welfare, the court shall impose, in addition to the penalties set forth in subsection (2), a fine of not less than $2,000,000.00 and, in addition to a fine, a sentence of 5 years' imprisonment. (5) To find a defendant civilly or criminally liable for substantial endangerment under subsection (3) or (4), the court must determine that the defendant knowingly or recklessly acted in such a manner as to cause a danger of death or serious bodily injury and that either of the following occurred: (a) The defendant had an actual awareness, belief, or understanding that his or her conduct would cause a substantial danger of death or serious bodily injury. (b) The defendant acted in gross disregard of the standard of care that any reasonable person should observe in similar 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 circumstances. (6) Knowledge possessed by a person other than the defendant under subsection (3) or (4) may be attributed to the defendant if the defendant took affirmative steps to shield himself or herself from the relevant information. (7) Both of the following apply to a civil fine or other award ordered paid pursuant to this section: (a) It is payable to the state of Michigan and credited to the carbon dioxide sequestration fund created in section 65116. (b) It constitutes a lien on any property, of any nature or kind, owned by the defendant. (8) A lien under subsection (7)(b) has priority over all other liens and encumbrances, except those filed or recorded before the date of judgment, only if notice of the lien is filed or recorded as required by state or federal law. (9) A lien filed or recorded pursuant to subsection (8) shall be terminated according to the procedures required by state or federal law within 14 days after the fine or other award ordered to be paid is paid. (10) In addition to any other method of collection, any fine or other award ordered paid may be recovered by right of setoff to any debt owed to the defendant by this state, including the right to a refund of income taxes paid. Sec. 65115. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, and each January 1 thereafter, each carbon dioxide sequestration project operator shall report to the department the tons of carbon dioxide injected in the prior 12 months. (2) The department shall assess on an operator a sequestration fee of $5.00 per ton of carbon dioxide injected. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) Beginning January 1, 2027, the state treasurer shall adjust the sequestration fee annually by the inflation rate as defined in section 34d of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.34d. (4) Except as provided in section 65311, fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the carbon dioxide sequestration fund created in section 65116. Sec. 65116. (1) The carbon dioxide sequestration fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit into the fund all civil fines and other civil awards collected under section 5530, to the extent provided in that section, or collected under section 65114, fees collected under section 65103, 65115, 65302, or 65303 or under section 15 of 1929 PA 16, MCL 483.15, and revenue from any other source designated for the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from investments to the fund. (3) Unexpended and unencumbered funds remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse to the general fund and shall be carried forward and be available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. (4) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (5) Money from the fund shall be expended, upon appropriation, only as follows: (a) The department shall expend not more than 10% for department administrative and enforcement costs incurred under this part and part 653. (b) The department shall expend not less than 40% for grants 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for projects that reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases by installing electric vehicle charging stations, otherwise electrifying end uses currently fueled by fossil fuels, increasing renewable energy production in this state, installing energy-efficient heat pumps, improving energy efficiency or weatherization of homes, installing battery storage, installing small-scale solar power systems, and other measures. Priority in awarding grants shall be given to projects located in or benefiting environmental justice communities and low-income residents. (c) The department shall expend not less than 30% for statewide mapping of groundwater resources and aquifers in Michigan and any information technology infrastructure or databases needed to support housing groundwater data or integrating groundwater data with other datasets and databases. If, in any given state fiscal year, the department determines that less than 30% of the fund is needed for the purposes of this subdivision, the department may expend the lesser needed amount and the amount not spent under this subdivision shall be expended under subdivision (b). (d) The state treasurer shall transfer not less than 20% to the carbon dioxide emergency planning and training fund created in section 8a of the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.408a. Sec. 65117. (1) Compensation generated for use of surface land or pore space under the control and management of an agency of this state, other than the department of natural resources, shall be deposited into the carbon dioxide sequestration fund created under section 65116. (2) Compensation generated for the use of surface land or pore space under the control of the department of natural resources, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 including, but not limited to, royalties for use of surface lands and fees per ton on carbon dioxide stored in pore space controlled by the department of natural resources, and money received from bonuses, rentals, delayed rentals, and royalties collected or reserved under provisions of leases for the capture, disposal, or storage of carbon dioxide, shall be deposited as follows: (a) 50% into the Michigan natural resources trust fund established in section 35 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. (b) 50% into the Michigan nongame fish and wildlife trust fund established in section 42 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Sec. 65118. The department may promulgate rules pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, to implement this part. The department shall promulgate rules to establish air, soil, and groundwater monitoring and sampling requirements for a sequestration project during the preinjection, active injection, and postinjection periods and during closure. Part 653 CARBON SEQUESTRATION UNITIZATION Sec. 65301. As used in this part: (a) "Carbon dioxide sequestration project" or "sequestration project" means those terms as defined in section 65101. (b) "Class II well" means a well described as class II in 40 CFR 144.6. (c) "Class VI well" means a well described as class VI in 40 CFR 144.6. (d) "Department" means that term as defined in section 65101. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) "Order for unit operations" means an order under section 65304(4). (f) "Plan for unit operations" or, unless the context indicates a different meaning, "plan" means a plan under section 65305. (g) "Pore space" means the portion of geologic media that contains gas or fluid, including, but not limited to, oil or water, and that can be used to store carbon dioxide. (h) "Storage reservoir" means that term as defined in section 65101. (i) "Unit area" means the pore space included in a carbon dioxide sequestration project, as that term is defined in section 65101, and the surface area overlaying that pore space. Sec. 65302. (1) Subject to the limitations of this part, the department shall make and enforce such orders, rules, and regulations and do such things as may be necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this part. (2) The department shall adopt a schedule of fees to be paid when amendments to petitions and other instruments in connection with petitions are filed. The fees shall be reasonably related to the cost of examination, inspection, and supervision required under this part and shall be deposited in the carbon dioxide sequestration fund created in section 65116. (3) The department may promulgate rules to implement this part pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Sec. 65303. Any applicant or prospective applicant for a permit under part 651 may file with the department a verified petition requesting an order for unit operations of the carbon 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 dioxide sequestration project or parts of the sequestration project and for pooling of interests in pore space in the applicable portion of the storage reservoir. The petition shall contain all of the following: (a) A copy of any permit, draft permit, or application for a permit under part 651 for the sequestration project or any part thereof. (b) A description of the proposed unit area. (c) The names, as disclosed by the records in the office of the register of deeds for each county in which the proposed unit area is located, of the following: (i) Each person that owns or has an interest in the surface estate or pore space within the proposed unit area, including mortgagees and the owners of other liens or encumbrances. (ii) Each person that owns or has an interest in the surface estate or pore space not within but immediately adjoining the proposed unit area. (iii) Each oil, gas, and mineral owner and lessee within the areas identified in subparagraphs (i) and (ii). (d) The address of each person identified in subdivision (c)(i) and (ii), if known. If the name and address of any person is unknown, the petition shall so indicate. (e) A statement of the type of operations proposed to comply with this part and part 651. (f) A proposed plan for use of surface area for activities required under part 651. (g) A proposed plan for unit operations applicable to the proposed unit area that the petitioner considers fair, reasonable, and equitable. The proposed plan shall include provisions for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 determining all of the following: (i) The pore space to be used within the unit area. (ii) The quantity of pore space storage capacity that will be assigned to each separately owned parcel within the unit area. (iii) The appointment of a unit operator. (iv) The effective date of the plan for unit operations. (v) The manner in which the unit area will be supervised and managed. (h) A verified statement that the petitioner has exercised due diligence to identify and contact each pore space owner and to seek an agreement with each pore space owner for pore space rights for the sequestration project, including a description of the due diligence efforts to identify, contact, and negotiate with each nonconsenting pore space owner. If the proposed plan for unit operations will be considered at a supplemental hearing, the verified statement may be filed separately before the supplemental hearing rather than as part of the petition. (i) An appraisal setting forth the amount and the method by which pore space owners will be compensated for use of the pore space. (j) A copy of the agreement entered into with each consenting pore space owner regarding the compensation to be paid to the consenting pore space owner. (k) The method by which nonconsenting pore space owners will be compensated. (l) A nonrefundable application fee of $250,000.00. The application fee shall be deposited into the carbon dioxide sequestration fund under part 651. Sec. 65304. (1) Promptly after filing a petition for unit 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 operations under section 65303, the petitioner shall provide notice by first class mail, with proof of delivery, to the following persons at their last known address: (a) The owners of record of the pore space interests and surface lands directly affected by the proposed sequestration project; oil, gas, and mineral owners and lessees as identified under section 65303(c)(iii); and the owners and lessees of the subsurface geological formations and cap rock. (b) The owners of record of the pore space interests and surface lands immediately adjacent to, and contiguous to, the lands or pore space directly affected by the proposed sequestration project. (2) The notice under subsection (1) shall include all of the following: (a) A description of the formation or formations and pore space proposed to be unitized. (b) The name, address, and telephone number of a representative of the petitioner who is available to discuss the petition. (c) For the notice to pore space and surface owners who have not approved the plan for unit operations, a copy of the petition, except that the petitioner may omit from the notice parts of the petition referred to in section 65303(c) and (d). (3) Within 60 days after an administratively complete petition for unit operations is filed and before issuing an order in response to the petition for unit operations, the department shall hold a public hearing on the petition. The department may prepare a draft order for public comment. The public notice shall include a link to a website where copies of the petition, any draft order, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and all order or petition attachments that are not protected under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, are posted. (4) The department shall provide notice of the purpose, time, and location of a public hearing under subsection (3) at least 30 days before the public hearing as follows: (a) By publication in 1 or more newspapers of general circulation in each county in which all or part of the proposed carbon dioxide sequestration project is to be located. (b) By posting the notice on the department's website. (c) By first-class mail with proof of delivery to the persons entitled to notice under section 65304(1). (5) If substantial compliance with the notice requirements in this section is achieved, inadvertent mistakes in compliance are not a bar to processing the permit. (6) For 60 days after the public hearing, the department shall receive public comments on the petition for unit operations and any draft order. The department will make copies of all comments received available on its website and consider those comments when rendering its decision on the petition. (7) Within 60 days after the public comment period, the department may issue an order for unit operations of the carbon dioxide sequestration project or parts of the sequestration project and for pooling of interests in pore space in the applicable portion of the storage reservoir if the department finds all of the following: (a) The material representations contained in the verified petition are substantially true. (b) One or both of the following apply: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (i) The petitioner has obtained a permit under part 651. (ii) The petitioner has obtained a class VI well permit or, if a class VI well permit application is still pending at least 1 year from the date the petition was filed, the petitioner has received a finding of administrative completeness from the United States Environmental Protection Agency. (c) The petitioner has made a good-faith effort to seek an agreement with all owners of pore space located within the proposed or permitted unit area. (d) The proposed plan for unit operations has been approved in writing by persons owning at least 75% of the pore space storage capacity within the unit area. (e) The type of operations contemplated by the proposed plan for unit operations is feasible. (f) The application outlines operations that will comply with part 651. (g) The injection of carbon dioxide into the storage reservoir for the unit will not endanger or injure any oil, gas, or other mineral formation in any material respect unless otherwise addressed in an arrangement between the applicant and the oil, gas, or mineral owner or lessee within the unit area. (h) The injection of carbon dioxide into the storage reservoir for the unit will not contaminate groundwater or pose a risk to public health, safety, or the environment. (i) The application outlines operations that will comply with part 651. (j) All nonconsenting pore space owners have received or will receive just compensation for use of the pore space and use of the surface for activities required by a class VI well permit. The 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 compensation shall meet the following requirements: (i) Be equal to or exceed the average total payment package, considered as a whole with respect to an individual owner, provided in agreements during the previous 365 days to similarly situated consenting pore space owners. (ii) Exclude any incentives, such as signing bonuses, provided to similarly situated consenting pore space owners before the initiation of injection. (iii) Exclude any compensation provided to a similarly situated consenting pore space owner that was not provided as part of an arm's length transaction. (iv) Include any operations term or injection term payments made upon or after the initiation of injection provided to similarly situated consenting pore space owners in consideration of allowing use of their pore space for sequestration of carbon dioxide. (8) In determining if pore space owners are similarly situated for purposes of subsection (7)(j), the department shall take into account all of the following: (a) The size, location, and proximity of the pore space. (b) The geologic characteristics of the pore space. (c) The restrictions on the use of the surface. (d) The actual use of the surface. (e) The relevant law applicable at the time the consenting pore space agreement was signed. (f) Title defects and title warranties. (g) The proximity of the pore space owners' property to any carbon sequestration infrastructure on the surface. (h) The fair market value of pore space when entering into a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 commercial contract. (9) If a pore space owner cannot be identified or cannot be located, the pore space owner is entitled to just compensation determined in the same manner as provided to the other nonconsenting pore space owners under subsections (7)(j) and (8). The unit operator shall deposit the compensation in a separate escrow account for payment when the pore space owner is identified and located, subject to the uniform unclaimed property act, 1995 PA 29, MCL 567.221 to 567.265. Sec. 65305. (1) An order for unit operations shall include terms and conditions determined by the department that are fair, reasonable, and equitable. In the order, the department shall prescribe a plan for unit operations that includes all of the following: (a) A description of the unit area, including any part of the surface estate within the unit area that will be used as part of the carbon dioxide sequestration project and for monitoring wells. (b) A statement in reasonable detail of the operations contemplated. (c) The quantity of pore space capacity allocated to each separately owned tract within the unit area, representing each tract's share of pore space being used in the sequestration project, and the method used to make that allocation. (d) The general manner in which the unit and the further development and operation of the unit area shall or may be conducted. (e) Provisions for determining the amount of just compensation to be provided to each nonconsenting pore space owner. (f) Provisions for supervision and management of the unit 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 operations. (g) The effective date of the plan for unit operations and the date when unit operations may commence. (h) The time when, conditions under which, and method by which the unit will be dissolved and its affairs wound up. (i) A requirement that the sequestration project comprising the unit area obtain a permit under part 651. (j) Findings by the department that the injection of carbon dioxide into the sequestration project for the unit area will not endanger or damage any oil, gas, or other mineral formation in any material respect, or that any such endangerment or damage has been addressed in an arrangement between the petitioner and the mineral lessee or mineral owners within the unit area. (k) Findings by the department that the injection of carbon dioxide into the storage reservoir will not contaminate groundwater or pose a risk to public health, safety, or the environment. (l) Any additional provisions that the department finds are appropriate for carrying on the unit operations. (2) An order for unit operations does not abrogate a surface owner's right to seek compensation for damages resulting from carbon dioxide sequestration activities. Sec. 65306. If monitoring conducted pursuant to United States Environmental Protection Agency or department requirements shows that carbon dioxide has migrated into the pore space of a pore space owner not previously included in an order for unit operations, the sequestration operator shall, within 14 days, notify that pore space owner of the migration and of the opportunity to petition the department for inclusion in the unit area. If the pore space owner submits such a petition, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 sequestration operator shall provide to the department, for its consideration of the petition, the monitoring information showing the migration of the carbon dioxide into the pore space of the pore space owner. The department shall grant the petition and modify the order for unit operations if it determines that stored carbon dioxide from a permitted sequestration project is physically present in the pore space owned by the pore space owner. If the department grants the petition for inclusion in the unit area and the pore space owner has not entered into an agreement with the sequestration operator for use of the pore space, the pore space owner shall be considered a nonconsenting pore space owner entitled to just compensation. Sec. 65307. Operations conducted pursuant to an order for unit operations constitute a fulfillment of all the express and implied obligations of each lease or contract covering the lands in the unit area to the extent that compliance with the obligations is prevented by the order for unit operations. Sec. 65308. (1) Property rights, leases, contracts, and all other rights and obligations shall be considered to be amended and modified to the extent necessary to conform to this part and to any valid and applicable plan for unit operations or order of the department made pursuant to this part. (2) Except to the extent that the parties affected agree otherwise, an order for unit operations does not result in a transfer of all or part of the title of any person's pore space rights in any tract within the unit area. Sec. 65309. (1) If the plan for unit operations so provides, a unit created under this part may, through its operator, sue, be sued, and contract as a unit in its own right. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) The operator of the unit, on behalf and for the account of all owners of interest within the unit area, may supervise, manage, and conduct further development and operations for the carbon dioxide sequestration project within the unit area under the authority and limitations of the order for unit operations. Sec. 65310. After the effective date of an order for unit operations, the unit area defined in the order shall not be operated by persons other than the unit operator or persons acting under the unit operator's authority, or operated other than in the manner and to the extent provided in the plan for unit operations. Sec. 65311. If the department or a board or officer of this state or of any agency or political subdivision of this state has control and management of land or pore space, that person may, on behalf of this state or the agency or political subdivision, consent to or participate in any plan for or program of unit operations initiated or adopted under this part. Sec. 65312. (1) Except as provided under section 65304, the department shall not issue, put into effect, revoke, change, renew, or extend an order under this part, unless the department has held a public hearing on the proposal. The public hearing shall be held at such time, place, and manner as provided for in this part or by rules promulgated under this part, including notice as provided in subsection (2). (2) Jurisdictional requirements of notice for all hearings required by this part, except proceedings for criminal or civil enforcement of this part, are satisfied by publication of the time, place, and issues involved in the hearing as provided in either of the following: (a) Publication once each week for 2 weeks consecutively in a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the unit area or any portion of the unit area is located with the date of last publication at least 20 days before the date set for the hearing. (b) Publication at least 20 days before the date set for the hearing in a trade journal, periodical, newsletter, or paper, or commercially available scout report, in general circulation within appropriate industries as determined by the department. Sec. 65313. A certified copy of an order of the department issued under this part may be recorded in the office of the register of deeds for each county where all or any portion of the unit area is located. The recordation constitutes notice to all persons in interest and their heirs, successors, and assigns. Sec. 65314. The department may promulgate rules to implement this part pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25 a) or House Bill No. 5665 (request no. H02796'25 a). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25 b) or House Bill No. 5666 (request no. H02796'25 b). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25 c) or House Bill No. 5667 (request no. H02796'25 c). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02797'25) or House Bill No. 5664 (request no. H02797'25). (e) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02798'25) or House Bill No. 5668 (request no. H02798'25).